Hawaii statutes.
[§521-36] Effect of termination.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, whenever a landlord or tenant
exercises a right to terminate a rental agreement, the obligations of each
party to the rental agreement shall cease upon the final discharge of all
obligations imposed by the rental agreement and by this chapter. [L 1972, c
132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next